aghul_pronouns_formation.lexd
PATTERNS
PronStem[0] [:у] PronCase1
PronStem[1] [:и] PronCase1
PronStem[2] [:и] PronCase1
PronStem [:е] PronCase2
PronStem[-1] [:а] PronCase3
PronStem[1] [:е] PronCase3

LEXICON PronStem
зун<prn><p1><sg>:з[0] #я
вун<prn><p2><sg>:в[0] #ты
хъин<prn><p1><pl><inc>:хъ[1] #мы инк
чин<prn><p1><pl><excl>:ч[2] #мы экс
чун<prn><p3><pl>:ч[0] #вы

LEXICON PronCase1
<nom>:н
<erg>:н

LEXICON PronCase2
<gen>:

LEXICON PronCase3
<dat>:с
<ins>:лди
<psl1>:фай
<psl2>:хъай
<psl3>:гIай

<apud>:ф
<ante>:гь
<post>:хъ
<sub>:кк
<cont>:к
<in>:ъ
<super>:л
<inter>:гl
